Missouri, session 2026, SB1137.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 193.245, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 193.245,
to read as follows:
193.245. It shall be unlawful for any person to permit
inspection of, or to disclose information contained in,
vital records or to copy or issue a copy of all or part of
any such record except as authorized by this law and by
regulation or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction
or in the following situations:
(1) [A listing of persons who are born or who die on a
particular date may be disclosed upon request, but no
information from the record other than the name and the date
of such birth or death shall be disclosed;
(2)] The department may authorize the disclosure of
information contained in vital records for legitimate
research purposes;
[(3)] (2) To a qualified applicant as provided in
section 193.255;
[(4)] (3) Copies of death records over fifty years old
may be disclosed upon request.
✓
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.